Washington statutes.
RCW 10.98.140

Criminal justice forecasting—Sentencing records.

(1) The section, the department, and the office of financial management shall be the primary sources of information for criminal justice forecasting. The information maintained by these agencies shall be complete, accurate, and sufficiently timely to support state criminal justice forecasting.

(2) The caseload forecast council shall keep records on all sentencings above or below the standard range defined by chapter 9.94A RCW. As a minimum, the records shall include the name of the offender, the crimes for which the offender was sentenced, the name and county of the sentencing judge, and the deviation from the standard range. Such records shall be made available to public officials upon request.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 40 s 32; 1987 c 462 s 4; 1985 c 201 s 6; 1984 c 17 s 14.]

NOTES:

Application—Recalculation of community custody terms—2011 1st sp.s. c 40: See note following RCW 9.94A.501.

Effective dates—1987 c 462: See note following RCW 13.04.116.